Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Subtitle 4. Name

271B.4-010.
Corporate name.

The name of each corporation shall satisfy the requirements of KRS

14A.3-010

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 137, §
1, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
57, effective July 15, 2010; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 151, §
53, effective January 1, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(1/1/2011). This section was repealed and reenacted without change to the existing language by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51, effective 7/15/10, and repealed and reenacted with the new language by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 151, effective 1/1/2011. Pursuant to Section 184 of Acts ch. 51, it was the intent of the General Assembly that the repeal and reenactment by ch. 51 not serve to void amendments made by other bills, and these Acts do not appear to be in conflict, therefore, they have been codified together.

271B.4-020.
Reserved name. [Repealed.]

271B.4-030.
Registered name. [Repealed.]